Utah statutes.
20A-12-303 (Superseded 01/01/11).   Separate account for campaign funds.
(1)  The judge or the judge's personal campaign committee shall deposit each
contribution in one or more separate personal campaign accounts in a financial
institution.
(2)  The judge or the judge's personal campaign committee may not deposit or
mingle any contributions received into a personal or business account.
